Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 4. Copyrights by State Agencies.

Secs. 44.99.300 — 44.99.350.
[Renumbered as AS 40.25.300 — 40.25.350.]

Sec. 44.99.400.
Software copyrights.

A state agency may hold the copyright for software created by the agency or developed by a private contractor for an agency, and may enforce its rights to protect the copyright. In this section, “state agency” means a department, institution, board, commission, division, authority, public corporation, committee, or other administrative unit of the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of state government, including the University of Alaska, the Alaska Aerospace Corporation, and the Alaska Railroad Corporation.

History.

(§ 15 ch 200 SLA 1990; am § 13 ch 88 SLA 1991; am § 135 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.99.050. Renumbered in 1990.

In 2009, under § 2, ch. 60, SLA 2009, in this section “Alaska Aerospace Corporation” was substituted for “Alaska Aerospace Development Corporation”.